Utah statutes.
63A-13-502.   Report and recommendations to governor and Executive Appropriations Committee.

(1)  The inspector general of Medicaid services shall, on an annual basis, prepare a written report on the activities of the office for the preceding fiscal year.

(2)  The report shall include:

(a)  non-identifying information, including statistical information, on:

(i)  the items described in Subsection 63A-13-202(1)(b) and Section 63A-13-204;

(ii)  action taken by the office and the result of that action;

(iii)  fraud, waste, and abuse in the state Medicaid program;

(iv)  the recovery of fraudulent or improper use of state and federal Medicaid funds;

(v)  measures taken by the state to discover and reduce fraud, waste, and abuse in the state Medicaid program;

(vi)  audits conducted by the office;

(vii)  investigations conducted by the office and the results of those investigations; and

(viii)  administrative and educational efforts made by the office and the division to improve compliance with Medicaid program policies and requirements;

(b)  recommendations on action that should be taken by the Legislature or the governor to:

(i)  improve the discovery and reduction of fraud, waste, and abuse in the state Medicaid program;

(ii)  improve the recovery of fraudulently or improperly used Medicaid funds; and

(iii)  reduce costs and avoid or minimize increased costs in the state Medicaid program;

(c)  recommendations relating to rules, policies, or procedures of a state or local government entity; and

(d)  services provided by the state Medicaid program that exceed industry standards.

(3)  The report described in Subsection (1) may not include any information that would interfere with or jeopardize an ongoing criminal investigation or other investigation.

(4) On or before October 1 of each year, the inspector general of Medicaid services shall provide the report described in Subsection (1) to the Executive Appropriations Committee of the Legislature and to the governor on or before October 1 of each year.

(5)  The inspector general of Medicaid services shall present the report described in Subsection (1) to the Executive Appropriations Committee of the Legislature before November 30 of each year.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 12, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 359, 2013 General Session

